New Mexico, session 2026, HB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 30-31-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1972, Chapter 84, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read: "30-31-3. DUTY TO ADMINISTER.-- A. The board shall administer the Controlled Substances Act and may add by [regulation] rule substances to the list of substances enumerated in Schedules I through IV pursuant to the procedures of the [Uniform Licensing] State Rules Act. In determining whether a substance has the potential for abuse, the board shall consider the following: (1) the actual or relative abuse of the substance; (2) the scientific evidence of the pharmacological effect of the substance, if known; (3) the state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance; (4) the history and current pattern of abuse; (5) the scope, duration and significance of abuse; (6) the risk to the public health; and (7) the potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability. B. After considering the factors enumerated in Subsection A of this section, the board shall make findings and issue [regulations] rules controlling the substance if it finds the substance has a potential for abuse. C. If [any] a substance is designated as a controlled substance under federal law and notice is given to the board, the board may, by [regulation] rule, similarly control the substance under the Controlled Substances Act after providing for a hearing pursuant to the [Uniform Licensing] State Rules Act. D. If the federal food and drug administration approves synthetic psilocybin or a drug containing synthetic psilocybin, synthetic psilocybin or the drug containing synthetic psilocybin shall be approved for use in New Mexico. [D.] E. Authority to control under this section does not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, tobacco or pesticides as defined in the Pesticide Control Act." SECTION 2. Section 30-31-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1972, Chapter 84, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "30-31-6. SCHEDULE I.--The following controlled substances are included in Schedule I: A. any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers, unless specifically exempted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1) acetylmethadol; (2) allylprodine; (3) alphacetylmethadol; (4) alphameprodine; (5) alphamethadol; (6) benzethidine; (7) betacetylmethadol; (8) betameprodine; (9) betamethadol; (10) betaprodine; (11) clonitazene; (12) dextromoramide; (13) dextrorphan; (14) diampromide; (15) diethylthiambutene; (16) dimenoxadol; (17) dimepheptanol; (18) dimethylthiambutene; (19) dioxaphetyl butyrate; (20) dipipanone; (21) ethylmethylthiambutene; (22) etonitazene; (23) etoxeridine; (24) furethidine; (25) hydroxypethidine; (26) ketobemidone; (27) levomoramide; (28) levophenacylmorphan; (29) morpheridine; (30) noracymethadol; (31) norlevorphanol; (32) normethadone; (33) norpipanone; (34) phenadoxone; (35) phenampromide; (36) phenomorphan; (37) phenoperidine; (38) piritramide; (39) proheptazine; (40) properidine; (41) racemoramide; and (42) trimeperidine; B. any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically exempted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1) acetorphine; (2) acetyldihydrocodeine; (3) benzylmorphine; (4) codeine methylbromide; (5) codeine-N-oxide; (6) cyprenorphine; (7) desomorphine; (8) dihydromorphine; (9) etorphine; (10) heroin; (11) hydromorphinol; (12) methyldesorphine; (13) methyldihydromorphine; (14) morphine methylbromide; (15) morphine methylsulfonate; (16) morphine-N-oxide; (17) myrophine; (18) nicocodeine; (19) nicomorphine; (20) normorphine; (21) pholcodine; and (22) thebacon; C. any material, compound, mixture or preparation that contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically exempted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; (2) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; (3) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; (4) bufotenine; (5) diethyltryptamine; (6) dimethyltryptamine; (7) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy amphetamine; (8) ibogaine; (9) lysergic acid diethylamide; (10) mescaline; (11) peyote, except as otherwise provided in the Controlled Substances Act; (12) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (13) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (14) psilocybin, except as provided otherwise in the Controlled Substances Act and the Medical Psilocybin Act and except for federal food and drug administration-approved synthetic psilocybin or -approved drugs that contain synthetic psilocybin; (15) psilocin, except as provided otherwise in the Controlled Substances Act and the Medical Psilocybin Act; (16) synthetic cannabinoids, including: (a) 1-[2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl] -3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; (b) 1-butyl-3-(1-napthoyl)indole; (c) 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; (d) 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; (e) 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl) indole; (f) cannabicyclohexanol (CP 47, 497 and homologues: 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S) -3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP-47,497); and 5-(1, 1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol; (g) 6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl) -6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10, 10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol); (h) dexanabinol, (6aS,10aS) -9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl) -6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol; (i) 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro naphthoyl) indole; (j) (2-methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl) -1-naphthalenyl-methanone; and (k) 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-(3-hydroxy cyclohexyl)-phenol; (17) 3,4-methylenedioxymethcathinone; (18) 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone; (19) 4-methylmethcathinone; (20) 4-methoxymethcathinone; (21) 3-fluoromethcathinone; and (22) 4-fluoromethcathinone; D. the enumeration of peyote as a controlled substance does not apply to the use of peyote in bona fide religious ceremonies by a bona fide religious organization, and members of the organization so using peyote are exempt from registration. Any person who manufactures peyote for or distributes peyote to the organization or its members shall comply with the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 and all other requirements of law; E. the enumeration of psilocybin and psilocin in this schedule does not apply to their medical use as provided in the Medical Psilocybin Act; F. the enumeration of Schedule I controlled substances does not apply to: (1) hemp pursuant to rules promulgated by the board of regents of New Mexico state university on behalf of the New Mexico department of agriculture; (2) cultivation of hemp by persons pursuant to rules promulgated by the board of regents of New Mexico state university on behalf of the New Mexico department of agriculture; (3) tetrahydrocannabinols or chemical derivatives of tetrahydrocannabinols, including tetrahydrocannabinols or chemical derivatives of tetrahydrocannabinols with concentrations of up to five percent as measured using a post-decarboxylation method and based on percentage dry weight, possessed by a person in connection with the cultivation, transportation, testing, researching, manufacturing or other processing of the plant Cannabis sativa L., or any part of the plant whether growing or not, if authorized pursuant to rules promulgated, pursuant to the Hemp Manufacturing Act, by the board of regents of New Mexico state university on behalf of the New Mexico department of agriculture or the department of environment; or (4) tetrahydrocannabinols or chemical derivatives of tetrahydrocannabinols, including tetrahydrocannabinols or chemical derivatives of tetrahydrocannabinols in any concentration possessed by a person in connection with the extraction of tetrahydrocannabinols or chemical derivatives of tetrahydrocannabinols, if authorized pursuant to rules promulgated, pursuant to the Hemp Manufacturing Act, by the board of regents of New Mexico state university on behalf of the New Mexico department of agriculture or the department of environment; and G. controlled substances added to Schedule I by rule adopted by the board pursuant to Section 30-31-3 NMSA 1978." - 10 -